Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8217
General level rehabilitation center, defined.

General level rehabilitation center means a rehabilitation center which provides services to individuals with musculoskeletal injuries, peripheral nerve injuries, uncomplicated lower extremity amputations, and other diagnoses resulting in functional impairment in one or more functional areas, with minimum to moderate impairment or complexity.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 17;

Laws 2015, LB46, § 5.